Utah statutes.
58-42a-304.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, a person who performs activities that are repetitive and routine in nature and that do not require specific skills or knowledge may engage in acts or practices included within the definition of the practice of occupational therapy under general supervision of an occupational therapist as defined by rule, without being licensed under this chapter.

